Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 16. Protected Series.

§ 13.1-1088.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“After a merger”
or

“after the merger”

means when a merger under §

13.1-1099.16

becomes effective and afterwards.

“Asset”
means property:

In which a series limited liability company or protected series has rights; or

As to which the series limited liability company or protected series has the power to transfer rights.

“Associated asset”
means an asset that meets the requirements stated in §

13.1-1099.2

.

“Associated member”
means, with respect to a protected series, a member that meets the requirements stated in §

13.1-1099.3

.

“Before a merger”
or

“before the merger”

means before a merger under §

13.1-1099.16

becomes effective.

“Continuing protected series”
means a protected series of a surviving company that continues in uninterrupted existence after a merger under §

13.1-1099.16

.

“Merging company”
means a limited liability company that is party to a merger under § 13.1-1099.16.

“Non-associated asset”
means:

“Non-surviving company”
means a merging company whose separate existence ceases after a merger under § 13.1-1099.16.

“Principal office of the protected series”
means the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, where the principal executive offices of a protected series of a domestic or foreign series limited liability company are located or, if there are no such offices, the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, so designated by the protected series. The designation of the principal office of a protected series in the most recent statement of change filed pursuant to §

13.1-1018.1

and subsection G of §

13.1-1095

shall be conclusive for the purpose of this chapter.

“Protected series assignee”
means a person to which all or part of a protected series membership interest of a protected series of a series limited liability company has been transferred, other than the series limited liability company. “Protected series assignee” includes a person that owns a protected series membership interest as a result of ceasing to be an associated member of a protected series.

“Protected series manager”
means a person under whose authority the powers of a protected series are exercised and under whose direction the activities and affairs of the protected series are managed pursuant to the operating agreement, this article, and other provisions of this chapter.

“Protected series membership interest”
means the share of the profits and losses of a protected series and the right to receive distributions.

“Relocated protected series”
means a protected series of a non-surviving company which, after a merger under § 13.1-1099.16, continues in uninterrupted existence as a protected series of the surviving company.

“Surviving company”
means a merging company that is the survivor of a merger under § 13.1-1099.16.

“Survivor”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1069.1

.

1.

An asset of a series limited liability company that is not an associated asset of the series limited liability company; or

2.

Any asset of a protected series of the series limited liability company that is not an associated asset of the protected series.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1089.
Nature of protected series.

A protected series of a series limited liability company is a person distinct from:

The series limited liability company, subject to subsection C of §

13.1-1090

, subdivision 1 of §

13.1-1099.11

, and §

13.1-1099.12

;

Another protected series of the series limited liability company;

A member of the series limited liability company, whether or not the member is an associated member of the protected series;

A protected series assignee of any protected series of the series limited liability company; and

An assignee of a membership interest of the series limited liability company.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2019).

§ 13.1-1090.
Powers and duration of protected series.

A protected series of a series limited liability company has the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections C and D, a protected series of a series limited liability company has the same powers and purpose as the series limited liability company.

A protected series of a series limited liability company ceases to exist not later than when the series limited liability company ceases to exist.

A protected series of a series limited liability company shall not:

Be a member of the series limited liability company;

Establish a protected series; or

Except as permitted by a law of the Commonwealth other than this article, have any purpose or power that the law of the Commonwealth other than this article prohibits a limited liability company from doing or having.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1091.
Governing law.

The law of the Commonwealth governs:

The internal affairs of a protected series of a series limited liability company, including:

Relations among any associated members of the protected series;

Relations among the protected series and (i) any associated member, (ii) the protected series manager, or (iii) any protected series assignee;

Relations between any associated member and (i) the protected series manager or (ii) any protected series assignee;

The rights and duties of a protected series manager;

Governance decisions affecting the activities and affairs of the protected series and the conduct of those activities and affairs; and

Procedures and conditions for becoming an associated member or protected series assignee;

Being a protected series of the series limited liability company or having as a protected series manager the series limited liability company or another protected series of the series limited liability company; or

Being or acting as a protected series manager of another protected series of the series limited liability company or a manager of the series limited liability company; or

The relations between a protected series of a series limited liability company and each of the following:

The liability of a person for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a protected series of a series limited liability company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of the person being or acting as:

The liability of a series limited liability company for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a protected series of the series limited liability company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of the series limited liability company:

The liability of a protected series of a series limited liability company for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the series limited liability company or of another protected series of the series limited liability company if the debt, obligation, or liability is asserted solely by reason of:

a.

The series limited liability company;

b.

Another protected series of the series limited liability company;

c.

A member of the series limited liability company that is not an associated member of the protected series;

d.

A protected series manager that is not a protected series manager of the protected series; and

e.

A protected series assignee that is not a protected series assignee of the protected series;

a.

An associated member, protected series assignee, or protected series manager of the protected series;

b.

A member of the series limited liability company that is not an associated member of the protected series;

c.

A protected series manager that is not a protected series manager of the protected series;

d.

A protected series assignee that is not a protected series assignee of the protected series;

e.

A manager of the series limited liability company; or

f.

An assignee of a membership interest of the series limited liability company;

a.

Having a statement of protected series designation or a statement of designation change filed with the Commission;

b.

Being or acting as a protected series manager of the protected series;

c.

Having the protected series be or act as a manager of the series limited liability company; or

d.

Owning a protected series assignable interest of the protected series; and

a.

The protected series:

b.

The company owning a protected series membership interest of the protected series.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1092.
Relation of operating agreement, this article, and the other articles of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and subject to §§

13.1-1093

and

13.1-1094

, the operating agreement of a series limited liability company governs:

The internal affairs of a protected series, including:

Relations among any associated members of the protected series;

Relations among the protected series and (i) any associated member of the protected series, (ii) any protected series manager, and (iii) any protected series assignee;

Relations between any associated member and (i) any protected series manager or (ii) any protected series assignee;

The rights and duties of a protected series manager;

Governance decisions affecting the activities and affairs of the protected series and the conduct of those activities and affairs; and

Procedures and conditions for becoming an associated member or protected series assignee;

A member of the series limited liability company who is not an associated member of the protected series;

A protected series assignee or protected series manager of another protected series; or

An assignee of the series limited liability company.

The relations among the protected series of a series limited liability company, the series limited liability company, and any other protected series of the series limited liability company; and

Relations between:

If the provisions of this chapter other than in this article restrict the power of an operating agreement to affect a matter, the restriction applies to a matter under this article according to the rules stated in §

13.1-1094

.

If the law of the Commonwealth other than this article contains a prohibition, limitation, requirement, condition, or other constraint pertaining to a limited liability company, a member, a manager, or other agent of the limited liability company, or an assignee of the limited liability company, except as otherwise provided in the law of the Commonwealth other than this article, the restriction applies according to the rules stated in §

13.1-1094

.

Except as otherwise provided in §

13.1-1093

, if the operating agreement of a series limited liability company does not provide for a matter described in subsection A in a manner permitted by this article, the matter is determined in accordance with the following rules:

To the extent that this article addresses the matter, this article governs; and

To the extent that this article does not address the matter, the provisions of this chapter other than in this article govern the matter according to the rules stated in §

13.1-1094

.

a.

The protected series, its protected series manager, any associated member of the protected series, or any protected series assignee of the protected series; and

b.

A person in the person’s capacity as:

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1093.
Additional limitations on operating agreement.

An operating agreement shall not vary the effect of:

This section;

Section

13.1-1089

;

Subsection A of §

13.1-1090

;

Subsection B of §

13.1-1090

to provide a protected series a power in addition to the powers provided to a limited liability company under the other articles of this chapter;

The limitations stated in subsection C or D of § 13.1-1090;

Section

13.1-1091

;

Section

13.1-1092

;

Section

13.1-1094

;

Section

13.1-1095

, except to vary the manner in which a limited liability company approves establishing a protected series;

Section

13.1-1096

;

Section

13.1-1099.2

;

Section

13.1-1099.3

;

Subsection A or B of §

13.1-1099.4

;

Subsection C, F, or G of §

13.1-1099.5

;

Section

13.1-1099.7

, except to decrease or eliminate a limitation of liability stated in §

13.1-1099.7

;

Section

13.1-1099.8

;

Section

13.1-1099.9

;

Section

13.1-1099.10

;

Subdivisions 1, 4, and 5 of §

13.1-1099.11

;

Section

13.1-1099.12

, except to designate a different person to manage winding up;

Section

13.1-1099.13

;

Sections

13.1-1099.14

through

13.1-1099.2

0;

Sections

13.1-1099.21

,

13.1-1099.22

, and

13.1-1099.23

;

Sections

13.1-1099.25

and

13.1-1099.26

; or

A provision of this article pertaining to:

A registered office or registered agent; or

The Commission, including provisions pertaining to records authorized or required to be delivered to the Commission for filing under this article or chapter.

An operating agreement shall not unreasonably restrict the duties and rights under §

13.1-1099.6

but may impose reasonable restrictions on the availability and use of information obtained under §

13.1-1099.6

and may provide appropriate remedies, including liquidated damages, for a breach of any reasonable restriction on use.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1094.
Rules for applying other articles of this chapter to specified provisions of this article.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection B and §

13.1-1093

, the following rules apply in applying §

13.1-1092

, subsections C and F of §

13.1-1099.5

, subdivision 4a of §

13.1-1099.11

, subsection A of §

13.1-1099.12

, and subdivision 2 of §

13.1-1099.13

:

A protected series of a series limited liability company is deemed to be a limited liability company that is organized separately from the series limited liability company and distinct from the series limited liability company and any other protected series of the series limited liability company;

An associated member of the protected series is deemed to be a member of the series limited liability company;

A protected series assignee of the protected series is deemed to be an assignee of the series limited liability company;

A protected series membership interest of the protected series is deemed to be a membership interest of the series limited liability company;

A protected series manager is deemed to be a manager of the series limited liability company;

An asset of the protected series is deemed to be an asset of the series limited liability company, whether or not the asset is an associated asset of the protected series; and

Any creditor or other obligee of the protected series is deemed to be a creditor or obligee of the series limited liability company.

Subsection A does not apply if its application would:

Vary §

13.1-1023

, subsection B or C of §

13.1-1092

, or §

13.1-1093

; or

Require the Commission to:

Accept for filing a type of record that this chapter expressly does not authorize or require a person to deliver to the Commission for filing; or

Make or deliver a record that neither this article nor any other provision of this chapter authorizes or requires the Commission to make or deliver.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2019).

§ 13.1-1095.
Protected series designation; amendment.

A limited liability company may establish a protected series. A proposal to establish a protected series shall be approved by the affirmative vote or consent of all members.

To establish a protected series, a limited liability company shall deliver to the Commission for filing a statement of protected series designation setting forth:

The name of the limited liability company;

The name of the protected series being established;

The post office address of the principal office of the protected series; and

A statement that the establishment of the protected series was approved by the affirmative vote or consent of all members of the limited liability company.

If the Commission finds that the statement of protected series designation complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of protected series designation.

A series limited liability company may amend a statement of a protected series designation that has not been canceled. For an amendment to a statement of protected series designation to be adopted, the amendment shall be approved by the affirmative vote or consent of all members.

To amend a statement of protected series designation, a series limited liability company shall deliver to the Commission for filing a statement of designation change setting forth:

The name of the series limited liability company;

The name of the protected series to which the designation change applies;

The text of each change to the statement of protected series designation; and

A statement that the amendment was approved by the affirmative vote or consent of all members of the series limited liability company.

If the Commission finds that the statement of protected series designation change complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of designation change.

Notwithstanding subsection D, a series limited liability company may change the address of the principal office of a protected series of the series limited liability company on the records of the Commission by filing a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-1018.1

, except that the statement of change shall also set forth the name of the protected series and, in lieu of the address of the current and new principal office of the series limited liability company, the address of the current and new principal office of the protected series.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1096.
Name.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection B, the name of a protected series shall comply with the provisions of §

13.1-1012

.

The name of a protected series of a series limited liability company shall:

Begin with the name of the series limited liability company, including any words or abbreviation required by subsection A of §

13.1-1012

to designate that the series limited liability company is a limited liability company; and

Contain the phrase “protected series” or the abbreviation “P.S.” or “PS.”

If a series limited liability company changes its name, the series limited liability company shall deliver to the Commission for filing a statement of designation change for each protected series of the series limited liability company pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-1095

.

History.

2019, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “words” for “word” in subdivision B 1. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1097.
Registered office and registered agent.

The registered office and registered agent in the Commonwealth for a series limited liability company are the registered office and registered agent in the Commonwealth for each protected series of the series limited liability company.

A person that ceases to be the registered agent for a series limited liability company ceases to be the registered agent for each protected series of the series limited liability company.

A person that ceases to be the registered agent for a protected series of a series limited liability company, other than a protected series that has been canceled, ceases to be the registered agent of the series limited liability company and of any other protected series of the series limited liability company.

Except as otherwise agreed by a series limited liability company and its registered agent, the agent is not obligated to distinguish between a process, notice, demand, or other record concerning the series limited liability company and a process, notice, demand, or other record concerning a protected series of the series limited liability company.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1098.
Service of process, notice, or demand.

A protected series of a series limited liability company may be served with any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law by:

Serving the series limited liability company that established the protected series;

Serving the registered agent of the protected series; or

Other means authorized by any law of the Commonwealth other than as specified in this article.

Service of process, notice, or demand on a series limited liability company is notice to each protected series of the series limited liability company of service of the process, notice, or demand and the contents thereof.

Service of process, notice, or demand on a protected series of a series limited liability company is notice to the series limited liability company and any other protected series of the series limited liability company of service of the process, notice, or demand and the contents thereof.

Service of process, notice, or demand on a foreign series limited liability company is notice to each foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company of the process, notice, or demand and the contents thereof.

Service of a process, notice, or demand on a foreign protected series of a foreign series limited liability company is notice to the foreign series limited liability company and any other foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company of service of the process, notice, or demand and the contents thereof.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.
Effectiveness of notice.

Notice to a person under subsection B, C, D, or E of §

13.1-1098

is effective against the person whether or not the process, notice, or demand identifies the person if the process, notice, or demand identifies the person so long as the process, notice, or demand names as a party and identifies:

The series limited liability company or a protected series of the series limited liability company; or

The foreign series limited liability company or a foreign protected series of the foreign series limited liability company.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.1.
Annual registration fees.

The Commission shall assess and collect from each protected series and each foreign protected series whose existence or registration to transact business in Virginia has not been canceled an annual registration fee in accordance with Article 11 (§

13.1-1061

et seq.). The provisions of §§

13.1-1050.2

,

13.1-1056.1

, and

13.1-1066

shall apply to each protected series and each foreign protected series, as the case may be.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.2.
Associated assets.

Only an asset of a protected series may be an associated asset of the protected series. Only an asset of a series limited liability company may be an associated asset of the series limited liability company.

An asset of a protected series is an associated asset of the protected series only if the protected series creates and maintains records that state the name of the protected series and describe the asset with sufficient specificity to permit a disinterested, reasonable individual to:

Identify the asset and distinguish it from any other assets of the protected series, any assets of the series limited liability company, and any assets of any other protected series of the series limited liability company;

Determine when and from what person the protected series acquired the asset or how the asset otherwise became an asset of the protected series; and

If the protected series acquired the asset from the series limited liability company or another protected series of the series limited liability company, determine any consideration paid, the payor, and the payee.

An asset of a series limited liability company is an associated asset of the series limited liability company only if the series limited liability company creates and maintains records that state the name of the series limited liability company and describe the asset with sufficient specificity to permit a disinterested, reasonable individual to:

Identify the asset and distinguish it from any other assets of the series limited liability company and any assets of any protected series of the series limited liability company;

Determine when and from what person the series limited liability company acquired the asset or how the asset otherwise became an asset of the series limited liability company; and

If the series limited liability company acquired the asset from a protected series of the series limited liability company, determine any consideration paid, the payor, and the payee.

The records and recordkeeping required by subsections B and C may be organized by specific listing, category, type, quantity, or computational or allocational formula or procedure, including a percentage or share of any asset, or in any other reasonable manner.

To the extent permitted by the law of the Commonwealth other than this article, a series limited liability company or a protected series of the series limited liability company may hold an associated asset directly or indirectly, through a representative, nominee, or similar arrangement, except that:

A protected series shall not hold an associated asset in the name of the series limited liability company or another protected series of the series limited liability company; and

The series limited liability company may not hold an associated asset in the name of a protected series of the series limited liability company.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.3.
Associated members.

Only a member of a series limited liability company may be an associated member of a protected series of the series limited liability company.

A member of a series limited liability company becomes an associated member of a protected series of the series limited liability company if the operating agreement or a procedure established by the operating agreement states:

That the member is an associated member of the protected series;

The date on which the member became an associated member; and

Any protected series membership interest the associated member has in connection with becoming or being an associated member.

If a person that is an associated member of a protected series of a series limited liability company is dissociated from the series limited liability company, the person ceases to be an associated member of the protected series.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 73 (2019).

§ 13.1-1099.4.
Protected series membership interests.

A protected series membership interest of a protected series of a series limited liability company shall be owned initially by an associated member of the protected series or the series limited liability company.

If a protected series of a series limited liability company has no associated members when established, the series limited liability company owns the protected series membership interests in the protected series.

In addition to acquiring a protected series membership interest under subsection B, a series limited liability company may acquire a protected series membership interest through a transfer from another person or as provided in the operating agreement.

Except for subdivision A 3 of §

13.1-1094

, a provision of this article that applies to a protected series assignee of a protected series of a series limited liability company applies to the series limited liability company in its capacity as an owner of a protected series membership interest of the protected series. A provision of the operating agreement of a series limited liability company that applies to a protected series assignee of a protected series of the series limited liability company applies to the series limited liability company in its capacity as an owner of a protected series membership interest of the protected series.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.5.
Management.

A protected series may have more than one protected series manager.

If a protected series has no associated members, the series limited liability company is the protected series manager.

Section

13.1-1094

shall be applicable to the determination of any duties of a protected series manager of a protected series of a series limited liability company to:

The protected series;

Any associated member of the protected series; and

Any protected series assignee of the protected series.

Solely by reason of being or acting as a protected series manager of a protected series of a series limited liability company, a person owes no duty to:

The series limited liability company;

Another protected series of the series limited liability company; or

Another person in that person’s capacity as:

A member of the series limited liability company that is not an associated member of the protected series;

A protected series assignee or protected series manager of another protected series; or

An assignee of the series limited liability company.

An associated member of a protected series of a series limited liability company has the same rights as any other member of the series limited liability company to vote on or consent to an amendment to the series limited liability company’s operating agreement or any other matter being decided by the members, whether or not the amendment or matter affects the interests of the protected series or the associated member.

Sections

13.1-1042

through

13.1-1045

apply to a protected series in accordance with §

13.1-1094

.

An associated member of a protected series is an agent for the protected series with power to bind the protected series to the same extent that a member of a limited liability company is under subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-1021.1

an agent for the series limited liability company with statutory power to bind the company.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.6.
Right of person not associated member of protected series to information concerning protected series.

A member of a series limited liability company that is not an associated member of a protected series of the series limited liability company has a right to information concerning the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that a member that is not a manager of a manager-managed limited liability company has a right to information concerning the limited liability company under subsection B of §

13.1-1028

or other applicable law.

A person formerly an associated member of a protected series has a right to information concerning the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that a person dissociated as a member of a manager-managed limited liability company has a right to information concerning the limited liability company under subsection B of §

13.1-1028

or other applicable law.

If an associated member of a protected series dies, the legal representative of the deceased associated member has a right to information concerning the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that the legal representative of a deceased member has a right to information concerning the limited liability company under subsection B of §

13.1-1028

or other applicable law.

A protected series manager of a protected series has a right to information concerning the protected series to the same extent, in the same manner, and under the same conditions that a manager of a manager-managed limited liability company has a right to information concerning the limited liability company under subsection B of §

13.1-1028

or other applicable law.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.7.
Limitations on liability.

A person is not liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of:

A protected series of a series limited liability company solely by reason of being or acting as:

An associated member, protected series manager, or protected series assignee of the protected series; or

A member, manager, or an assignee of the series limited liability company; or

A series limited liability company solely by reason of being or acting as an associated member, protected series manager, or protected series assignee of a protected series of the series limited liability company.

Subject to §

13.1-1099.10

, the following rules apply:

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a series limited liability company is solely the debt, obligation, or liability of the series limited liability company.

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a protected series is solely the debt, obligation, or liability of the protected series.

A series limited liability company is not liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a protected series of the series limited liability company solely by reason of the protected series being a protected series of the series limited liability company or the series limited liability company:

Being or acting as a protected series manager of the protected series;

Having the protected series manage the series limited liability company; or

Owning a protected series membership interest of the protected series.

A protected series of a series limited liability company is not liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the series limited liability company or another protected series of the series limited liability company solely by reason of:

a.

Being a protected series of the series limited liability company;

b.

Being or acting as a manager of the series limited liability company or a protected series manager of another protected series of the series limited liability company; or

c.

Having the series limited liability company or another protected series of the series limited liability company be or act as a protected series manager of the protected series.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

§ 13.1-1099.8.
Claim seeking to disregard limitation of liability.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection B, a claim seeking to disregard a limitation in §

13.1-1099.7

is governed by the principles of law and equity, including a principle providing a right to a creditor or holding a person liable for a debt, obligation, or other liability of another person, that would apply if each protected series of a series limited liability company were a limited liability company formed separately from the series limited liability company and distinct from the series limited liability company and any other protected series of the series limited liability company.

The failure of a series limited liability company or a protected series to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not a ground to disregard a limitation in subsection A of §

13.1-1099.7

but may be a ground to disregard a limitation in subsection B of §

13.1-1099.7

.

This section applies to a claim seeking to disregard a limitation of liability applicable to a foreign series limited liability company or foreign protected series and comparable to a limitation stated in §

13.1-1099.7

, if:

The claimant is a resident of the Commonwealth or transacting business or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth; or

The claim is to establish or enforce a liability arising under a law of the Commonwealth other than this chapter or from an act or omission in the Commonwealth.

History.

2019, c. 636.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”